Utah statutes.
76-8-705.   Willful interference with lawful activities of students or faculty.

(1) If any person on the campus of a private or state institution of higher education or upon any other facility owned or controlled by the governing board of the institution, willfully denies to students, school officials, employees, or invitees:

(a)  Lawful freedom of movement,

(b)  Lawful use of the property or facilities, or

(c)  Lawful ingress or egress to the institution's physical facilities, that person is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

(2)  If any person upon the campus of a private or state institution of higher education or upon any other facility owned or controlled by the governing board of the institution, willfully impedes the faculty or staff of the institution in the lawful performance of their duties, or willfully impedes a student of the institution in the lawful pursuit of his educational activities, that person is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

